New York, session 2025-2026, A5158.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (b) of section 301 of the vehicle and traffic 2 law is amended to read as follows: 3 (b) (1) The commissioner shall also require the inspection of any 4 motor vehicle duly registered under the laws of another state, a prov- 5 ince of Canada, a territory or a federal district to the extent to which 6 such state, province, territory or federal district requires the 7 inspection of motor vehicles duly registered under the laws of this 8 state; provided, however, that a motor vehicle used to carry passengers 9 for hire in for-hire vans and buses greater than nine passengers capaci- 10 ty have New York state issued license plates to receive a bi-annual New 11 York State DOT safety inspection for for-hire vehicle service under an 12 authorization issued by a municipality or the state shall not be 13 inspected in accordance with the provisions of this section unless such 14 motor vehicle used to carry passengers for hire in a for-hire vehicle is 15 duly registered under the laws of this state. 16 (2) For the purposes of this paragraph, the following terms shall have 17 the following meanings: 18 (A) "for-hire vehicle" shall mean a motor vehicle carrying passengers 19 for hire in New York state, with a seating capacity of nine passengers 20 and above, not including the driver; and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02482-07-5 A. 5158--B 2 1 (B) "seating capacity" shall include any plain view location which is 2 capable of accommodating a normal adult as part of an overall seat 3 configuration and design and is likely to be used as a seating position 4 while the vehicle is in motion. 5 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.